Louisiana, session 2026, SB76.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Art. 138 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 138. Modification of custody award
A. When a court has awarded custody pursuant to a judgment rendered
by considered decree, the award may be modified by the court within the period
of five years after the date of the judgment, in accordance with the best interest
of the child, only upon proof of either of the following:
(1) By clear and convincing evidence that the harm likely to be caused
by a change of custody is substantially outweighed by the advantages to the
child.
(2) That the continuation of the present custody award is so harmful to
the child as to justify modification.
B. After five years have elapsed from the date of a judgment rendered
by considered decree, and in all other cases, an award of custody may be
modified by the court upon a change in circumstances that materially affects the
welfare of the child if the modification is in the best interest of the child.
C. A judgment is "rendered by considered decree" when the trial court
receives evidence of parental fitness to exercise care, custody, and control of a
child and enters a final and appealable judgment based on its evaluation of that
evidence.
Revision Comments – 2026
(a) This revision codifies the standard set by the Louisiana Supreme Court
for modification of custody orders pursuant to considered decrees in Bergeron v.
Bergeron, 492 So. 2d 1193, 1200 (La. 1986), with modifications. It also codifies the
existing, and lesser, standard for modifying consent decrees. See, e.g., McCorvey v.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 76 ENROLLED
McCorvey, 916 So. 2d 357, 370-71 (La. App. 3 Cir. 2005). This revision is not
intended to abrogate the jurisprudence interpreting Bergeron; rather, it is intended
to add clarity by codifying the Bergeron standard and by calling attention to the often
jurisprudentially overlooked alternative weighing standard set forth in Bergeron.
(b) Louisiana jurisprudence explains that a consent decree subject to the best
interest standard is one made through "a stipulated judgment, such as when the
parties consent to a custodial arrangement, and no evidence of parental fitness is
taken." Alternatively, a considered decree is one "wherein the trial court receives
evidence of parental fitness to exercise care, custody, and control of a child."
McCorvey v. McCorvey, 916 So. 2d 357, 370-71 (La. App. 3 Cir. 2005); see also
Evans v. Lungrin, 708 So. 2d 731 (La. 1998). Some Louisiana courts have noted that
judgments may be the result of "hybrid" proceedings, as when the court received
some evidence of parental fitness, but the parties enter into a stipulated judgment
prior to the court's ruling. Such judgments should be treated under the modification
standard applicable to consent decrees. McCorvey, supra at 371.
(c) The use of "in all other cases" in Paragraph B of this Article contemplates
application of the lesser evidentiary standard to modification of a consent decree, a
considered decree once five years have elapsed from the date of that decree, and a
judgment as a result of hybrid proceedings.
(d) The change in circumstances described in Paragraph B of this Article
refers to a change that materially affects the child's welfare. Burns v. Burns, 236 So.
3d 571, 574 (La. App. 1 Cir. 2017). A parent's remarriage, engagement, and similar
life changes do not necessarily rise to such a level. See id.
(e) The standards set forth in this Article apply to modifications of judgments
of custody rendered by consent decree or considered decree and generally apply to
both physical and legal custody. They do not, however, apply to minor changes, such
as a change in visitation of a parent from a Tuesday night to a Wednesday night.
(f) Interim, temporary, or interlocutory custodial orders are not governed by
the standards set forth in this Article.
(g) Custodial orders entered by hearing officers, whether interim or
otherwise, are not "considered decrees" in accordance with this Article, as they are
not custodial awards made by a "trial court."
(h) On account of the enactment of this Article, Comment (d) of the 1993
Revision Comments to Article 131 has been superseded. This Article should be
consulted, as it elaborates upon and modifies jurisprudential treatment of custody
modification.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.